District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Vacated Rates Clarification Amendment Act of 2026".
Sec 2. Paragraph 67 of section 8 of Chapter 150 of An Act Making appropriations to
provide for the expenses of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth,
nineteen hundred and fourteen, and for other purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 977;
D.C. Code §34-607), is amended to read as follows:
"(a)(1) All orders and decisions of the Commission shall remain in full effect, except as
provided in § 34-604 hereof, unless and until they are suspended, superseded, or rescinded by the
Commission or are vacated by lawful order of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals. Any
order or decision of the Commission establishing or approving utility rates that is vacated by the

Court, whether on procedural, legal, or any other grounds, shall be rendered null, void, and
unenforceable as of the date of such vacatur. Upon such vacatur, the applicable rates shall
automatically revert, without further action by the Commission, to the most recently lawfully
approved rates in effect prior to the vacated order or decision.
(2) If, in any petition made to the said Court appealing from an order or decision
of the Commission it be alleged that substantial and irreparable property loss would be
occasioned to the petitioner by the operation of the said order pending the determination of the
said appeal, the Court shall set a time and place for hearing upon the said allegation after not less
than 3 days notice to the Commission (during which period the execution of the order or decision
shall be stayed), and the said Court may then, upon a clear showing of the irreparable and
substantial property loss as alleged, suspend the effective date of the said order. No such
suspension shall be for a greater period than 60 days without further order after notice or hearing
by the Court. In the event of the issuance of an order suspending the operation of any order of the
Commission, the Court may include therein such provision as it deems advisable for the
preservation of records or accounts and the impounding or otherwise securing of moneys
necessary to give effect to the order of the Commission in the event the said order is sustained.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.

This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of a veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review
as provided in sections 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the
District of Columbia Register.